Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.481

Changes in licensing categories—Effect on status of proceedings, existing rules, forms, and licenses.

(1) The changes made by chapter 23, Laws of 2008 regarding the licensing categories do not affect the status of a complaint, investigation, or other proceeding. A rule or form adopted by the director before July 1, 2010, remains in effect as a rule or form of the department until amended or changed.

(2) After July 1, 2010, a salesperson's license is continued in effect but is recognized by the department as a broker's license; and associate broker's, branch manager's, and designated broker's licenses are continued in effect but are recognized by the department as managing broker's licenses. All licensees are required to take a transition course by the licensee's first renewal date after July 1, 2010. The department shall approve the transition course for continuing education credit. All licenses retain their renewal dates established prior to July 1, 2010. New licenses may be issued after completion of the transition course and at the time of the licensee's first renewal date after July 1, 2010.

[ 2008 c 23 s 48.]